Utah statutes.
58-31c-105.   Pending disciplinary actions.

(1)  Notwithstanding Sections 58-31b-308 and 58-31c-102, a nurse licensed by a party state whose license is in any way restricted or otherwise subject to disciplinary action on January 1, 2000, or the date on which the nurse's home state adopts the Nurse Licensure Compact, may not practice as a registered nurse in this state without the express permission of the division in consultation with the Board of Nursing created in Section 58-31b-201.

(2)  Notwithstanding Section 58-31c-102, unprofessional conduct under Section 58-31b-502 includes practicing in a party state without first obtaining the express permission of that state if the nurse's license issued under Section 58-31b-301 is in anyway restricted or otherwise subject to disciplinary action on January 1, 2000.



Enacted by Chapter 65, 1999 General Session

